Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Errors and Omissions Insurance

§ 33-28-401.
Errors and omissions insurance; rulemaking authority; commission duties; certificate of coverage; administrative fee.

Beginning January 1, 2008, an applicant for a real estate license pursuant to W.S.

33-28-106

, a licensee renewing a license or an inactive licensee activating a license pursuant to W.S.

33-28-118

, shall submit proof of insurance coverage through the group program provided pursuant to this section or through certification of individual coverage. All licensees shall obtain and maintain errors and omissions insurance coverage under the group program or individual coverage.

The commission shall make errors and omissions insurance available to all licensees by contracting with an insurer for a group program after competitive bidding. Any group program obtained by the commission shall be available to all licensees and shall prevent the insurer from canceling any licensee. Licensees may obtain errors and omissions insurance independently if the coverage complies with the minimum requirements established by the commission.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to specify the terms and conditions of coverage required under this section, including the minimum limits and terms of the coverage, the permissible deductible and permissible exemptions. Each licensee shall be notified of the required terms and conditions at least thirty (30) days prior to the license renewal date. Each licensee who elects not to participate in the group program administered by the commission shall file a certificate of coverage showing compliance with the required terms and conditions with the commission by the license renewal date.

If the commission is unable to obtain errors and omissions insurance coverage to insure all licensees who elect to participate in the group program, at a reasonable annual premium not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00) per licensee, the errors and omissions insurance requirement of this section shall not apply during the year for which the commission cannot obtain the errors and omissions insurance coverage. The maximum premium amount shall be adjusted annually by the annual rate of inflation in this state for the preceding twelve (12) month period as calculated by the department of administration and information.

The commission shall charge and collect an administrative fee in addition to the premium paid from each licensee who obtains errors and omissions insurance through the group program. This administrative fee shall be of an amount sufficient to cover the administration of this section and shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the premium. The maximum premium specified in subsection (d) of this section applies only to premium cost and not to any administrative fee charged.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 174, § 1; 2007, ch. 95, § 1; 2009, ch. 63, § 1; 2011, ch. 104, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a) and (b) and designated the existing paragraph as (c); in present (c) deleted “Wyoming real estate”, substituted “shall” for “is authorized to”, deleted “reasonable” preceding “rules and regulations” and deleted “regarding optional errors and omissions insurance coverage for persons licensed under this chapter”; and added (d) and (e).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “program” for “plan” following “group” and “individual” for “optional” preceding “coverage” in the first sentence and added the second sentence, in (b), substituted “program” for “policy” following “group” in the first and second sentence, in (e), substituted “group program” for “commission” following “insurance through the” in the first sentence, and added (f).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (f), which defined “group program” and “individual coverage” as used in the section.